Tennessee statutes. Title 1 Code And Statutes
Chapter 3

Construction of Statutes

1-3-101. Repeals not retroactive.

The repeal of a statute does not affect any right which accrued, any duty imposed, any penalty incurred, nor any proceeding commenced, under or by virtue of the statute repealed.

Code 1858, § 49; Shan., § 61; Code 1932, § 12; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 1-301.

Cross-References. Repeal or amendment of criminal statutes, § 39-11-112.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 8 Tenn. Juris., Criminal Procedure, § 13; 23 Tenn. Juris., Statutes, § 51.

Law Reviews.

Constitutional Law — 1961 Tennessee Survey (James C. Kirby, Jr.), 14 Vand. L. Rev. 1171 (1961).

“Putting Legislative History to a Vote,” see 53 Vand. L. Rev. 1529 (2000).

“The Use of Legislative History in a System of Separated Powers,” see 53 Vand. L. Rev. 1457 (2000).

“Timing and Delegation: A Reply,” see 53 Vand. L. Rev. 1543 (2000).

1-3-102. Computation of time.

The time within which any act provided by law is to be done shall be computed by excluding the first day and including the last, unless the last day is a Saturday, a Sunday, or a legal holiday, and then it shall also be excluded.

Code 1858, § 48; Shan., § 60; Code 1932, § 11; Acts 1965, ch. 203, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 1-302.

Compiler's Notes. This section may be superseded in part by Tenn. R. Crim. P. 45 and Tenn. R. Civ. P. 6.01.

Cross-References. Computation of time for election purposes, § 2-1-115.

Textbooks. Pritchard on Wills and Administration of Estates (4th ed., Phillips and Robinson), §§ 78, 773.

Tennessee Jurisprudence, 2 Tenn. Juris., Appeal and Error, § 51; 16 Tenn. Juris., Judgments and Decrees, § 73; 23 Tenn. Juris., Time, § 1.

Law Reviews.

1985 Tennessee Survey: Selected Developments in Tennessee Law, 53 Tenn. L. Rev. 337 (1986).

1-3-103. Conflicts within code.

If provisions of different titles or chapters of the code appear to contravene each other, the provisions of each title or chapter shall prevail as to all matters and questions growing out of the subject matter of that title or chapter.

Code 1932, § 13; modified; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 1-303.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 2 Tenn. Juris., Appeal and Error, § 16.

Law Reviews.

Criminal Law and Procedure — 1962 Tennessee Survey (Robert E. Kendrick), 16 Vand. L. Rev. 712 (1963).

1-3-104. Tense — Gender — Number of words.

Words used in this code in the past or present tense include the future, and the future tense includes the present.

Words importing the masculine gender include the feminine and neuter, except when the contrary intention is manifest.

Singular includes the plural and the plural the singular, except when the contrary intention is manifest.

Code 1858, § 50; Shan., § 62; mod. Code 1932, § 14; modified; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 1-304.

Cross-References. English deemed official and legal language, § 4-1-404.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 23 Tenn. Juris., Statutes, § 23.

Attorney General Opinions. Senate Bill 1085/House Bill 1111, 110th Gen. Assem. (2017), which would codify one of the most basic canons of statutory construction, the “ordinary-meaning canon,” could be construed as a violation of the separation-of-powers doctrine embodied in the Tennessee Constitution. In construing certain statutes with gender-limiting words, a court would likely apply the very specific gender-inclusive requirements of T.C.A. § 1-3-104(b) rather than the very general “ordinary meaning” requirements of the proposed legislation. OAG 17-29, 2017 Tenn.AG LEXIS 28 (4/13/2017).

1-3-105. Definition of terms used in code.

As used in this code, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Age of majority” means eighteen (18) years of age or older; except that when purchasing, consuming or possessing alcoholic beverages, wine or beer as those terms are defined in title 57, “age of majority” means twenty-one (21) years of age. This subdivision (1) shall not be construed as prohibiting any person eighteen (18) years of age or older from selling, transporting, possessing or dispensing alcoholic beverages, wine or beer in the course of employment;

“Agriculture” means:

The land, buildings and machinery used in the commercial production of farm products and nursery stock;

The activity carried on in connection with the commercial production of farm products and nursery stock;

Recreational and educational activities on land used for the commercial production of farm products and nursery stock; and

Entertainment activities conducted in conjunction with, but secondary to, commercial production of farm products and nursery stock, when such activities occur on land used for the commercial production of farm products and nursery stock;

As used in this definition of agriculture, the term “farm products” means forage and sod crops; grains and feed crops; dairy and dairy products; poultry and poultry products; livestock, including breeding and grazing; fruits; vegetables; flowers; seeds; grasses; forestry products; fish and other aquatic animals used for food; bees; equine; and all other plants and animals that produce food, feed, fiber or fur;

As used in this definition of agriculture, the term “nursery stock” means all trees, shrubs, or other plants, or parts of such trees, shrubs or other plants, grown or kept for, or capable of, propagation, distribution or sale on a commercial basis;

“Code” includes the Tennessee Code and all amendments and revisions to the code and all additions and supplements to the code;

“Collector” includes any person entrusted with the collection of public revenue;

“Constable,” or other word used for an executive or ministerial officer, includes any person performing the duties of such officer, either generally or in special cases;

“Coroner,” or other word used for an executive or ministerial officer, includes any person performing the duties of such officer, either generally or in special cases;

“County executive” means and includes “county mayor” unless the context clearly indicates otherwise;

“County mayor” means and includes “county executive” unless the context clearly indicates otherwise;

“Executor” includes an administrator, where the subject matter applies to an administrator;

“Federal census,” “federal census of population,” or references to the federal decennial census, are deemed to be references to the federal decennial censuses of population as defined in § 1-3-116, and contained in the “Tables” volume of this code, Volume 13, or its replacement volume;

“Funeral and burial expenses” includes, but is not limited to, the cost of preparing the body for burial or other disposition, the funeral service, any funeral merchandise, flowers, honoraria, acknowledgment cards, postage, transporting the body to the place of burial or disposition, the burial space, crypt, mausoleum or other final resting place, the opening and closing thereof and any marker;

“Highway” includes public bridges and may be held equivalent to the words “county way,” “county road” or “state road”;

“Insane” includes all persons of unsound mind;

“Lands” includes lands, tenements and hereditaments, and all rights thereto and interests therein, equitable as well as legal;

“Livestock” means all equine as well as animals that are being raised primarily for use as food or fiber for human utilization or consumption including, but not limited to, cattle, sheep, swine, goats, and poultry;

“Minor” means any person who has not attained eighteen (18) years of age; except that where used in title 57 with respect to purchasing, consuming or possessing alcoholic beverages, wine or beer, “minor” means any person who has not attained twenty-one (21) years of age. This subdivision (16) shall not be construed as prohibiting any person eighteen (18) years of age or older from selling, transporting, possessing or dispensing alcoholic beverages, wine or beer in the course of employment;

“Month” means a calendar month;

“Oath” includes affirmation;

“Person” includes a corporation, firm, company or association;

“Personal property” includes money, goods, chattels, things in action, and evidences of debt;

“Personal representative,” when applied to those who represent a decedent, includes executors and administrators, unless the context implies heirs and distributees;

“Probate court” means the court having jurisdiction over the administration of the estates of decedents;

“Property” includes both personal and real property;

“Real estate” and “real property” include lands, tenements and hereditaments, and all rights thereto and interests therein, equitable as well as legal;

“Record” means information that is inscribed on a tangible medium or that is stored in an electronic or other medium and is retrievable in a perceivable form;

“Representative,” when applied to those who represent a decedent, includes executors and administrators, unless the context implies heirs and distributees;

“Road” includes public bridges and may be held equivalent to the words “county way,” “county road” or “state road”;

“Savings and loan association” includes a building and loan association, a federal or state savings and loan association, a federal savings bank, and any other financial institution, the accounts of which are insured by the federal savings and loan insurance corporation (FSLIC) or any successor of such corporation;

“Sheriff,” or other word used for an executive or ministerial officer, includes any person performing the duties of such officer, either generally or in special cases;

“Signature” or “signed” includes a mark, the name being written near the mark and witnessed, or any other symbol or methodology executed or adopted by a party with intention to authenticate a writing or record, regardless of being witnessed;

“State,” when applied to the different parts of the United States, includes the District of Columbia and the several territories of the United States;

“Subscription” includes a mark, the name being written near the mark and witnessed;

“Tennessean” denotes a permanent resident of the state, and such spelling is the recognized spelling of the word;

“Tennessee-based business enterprise” means a sole proprietorship, partnership, association, corporation, limited liability corporation, limited partnership or any other business entity having any:

Place of business permanently located within this state;

Employees permanently assigned to work stations or areas located within this state; or

Tangible assets permanently located within this state;

“United States” includes the District of Columbia and the several territories of the United States;

“Writing” or “written” includes printing, typewriting, engraving, lithography, and any other mode of representing words and letters; and

“Year” means a calendar year, unless otherwise expressed; but “year,” in reference to any appropriation from the state treasury, means fiscal year, unless otherwise expressed or implied.

As used in this code, undefined words shall be given their natural and ordinary meaning, without forced or subtle construction that would limit or extend the meaning of the language, except when a contrary intention is clearly manifest.

Code 1858, §§ 50-52, 54-57, 59; Shan., §§ 62-64, 65-68, 70; Code 1932, §§ 14-16, 18-21, 23-25; C. Supp. 1950, § 27.2; modified; Acts 1969, ch. 76, § 1; 1972, ch. 612, § 1; 1972, ch. 740, § 2; 1979, ch. 413, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 1-305; Acts 1983, ch. 304, § 1; 1984, ch. 705, § 1; 1984, ch. 1006, § 1; 1985, ch. 134, § 1; 1985, ch. 140, § 2; 1990, ch. 655, § 1; 1992, ch. 951, § 1; 1997, ch. 272, § 1; 2001, ch. 215, § 1; 2003, ch. 90, § 2; 2005, ch. 19, § 1; 2011, ch. 47, § 1; 2014, ch. 568, § 1; 2014, ch. 581, § 1; 2017, ch. 302, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. The federal savings and loan insurance corporation, referred to in (28), was abolished, effective February 1, 1992. See the Historical and Statutory Notes under 12 U.S.C. § 1437.

Acts 2003, ch. 90, § 2, directed the code commission to change all references from “county executive” to “county mayor” and to include all such changes in supplements and replacement volumes for the Tennessee Code Annotated.

Acts 2011, ch. 47, § 107 provided that nothing in the legislation shall be construed to alter or otherwise affect the eligibility for services or the rights or responsibilities of individuals covered by the provision on the day before the date of enactment of this legislation, which was July 1, 2011.

Acts 2011, ch. 47, § 108 provided that the provisions of the act are declared to be remedial in nature and all provisions of the act shall be liberally construed to effectuate its purposes.

Amendments. The 2014 amendment by ch. 568 added the definition of “livestock”.

The 2014 amendment by ch. 581 added (A)(iv) in the definition of “agriculture”.

The 2017 amendment added (b).

Effective Dates. Acts 2014, ch. 568, § 6. March 21, 2014.

Acts 2014, ch. 581, § 5. March 28, 2014.

Acts 2017, ch. 302, § 2. May 5, 2017.

Cross-References. Alcoholic beverage limitations on persons under 21, § 1-3-113.

Definition of agriculture, § 43-1-113.

Entities included within definition of savings and loan association, § 45-3-104.

“Minor” defined for purposes of municipal motion picture regulatory boards, § 6-54-404.

Penalty for sale of alcoholic beverages to minor, §§ 57-4-203, 57-5-303.

Textbooks. Gibson's Suits in Chancery (7th ed., Inman), § 44.

Pritchard on Wills and Administration of Estates (4th ed., Phillips and Robinson), §§ 16, 151, 193, 418, 453, 611.

Tennessee Jurisprudence, 2 Tenn. Juris., Animals, §§ 3, 4; 3 Tenn. Juris., Attachment and Garnishment, § 4; 5 Tenn. Juris., Bridges, § 3; 7 Tenn. Juris., Corporations, § 101; 12 Tenn. Juris., Executors and Administrators, § 2; 16 Tenn Juris., Interest, § 10; 18 Tenn. Juris., Mechanics' Liens, § 8; 18 Tenn. Juris., Minors, § 2; 22 Tenn. Juris., Signatures, § 1; 23 Tenn. Juris., Time, § 1; 25 Tenn. Juris., Wills, §§ 11, 117.

Law Reviews.

Probate—Taylor v. Holt: The Tennessee Court of Appeals Allows a Computer Generated Signature to Validate a Testamentary Will, (Chad Michael Ross), 35 U. Mem. L. Rev. 603 (2005).

Selection and Removal of Fiduciaries (Robert L. McMurray), 26 No. 3, Tenn. B.J. 22 (1990).

Attorney General Opinions. Senate Bill 1085/House Bill 1111, 110th Gen. Assem. (2017), which would codify one of the most basic canons of statutory construction, the “ordinary-meaning canon,” could be construed as a violation of the separation-of-powers doctrine embodied in the Tennessee Constitution. In construing certain statutes with gender-limiting words, a court would likely apply the very specific gender-inclusive requirements of T.C.A. § 1-3-104(b) rather than the very general “ordinary meaning” requirements of the proposed legislation. OAG 17-29, 2017 Tenn.AG LEXIS 28 (4/13/2017).

The definition for “agriculture” at T.C.A. §§ 1-3-105(2)(A) and 43-1-113(b)(1) is applicable to the word “agriculture” as used in the definition of “Farm Property” in T.C.A. § 67-5-501(3). OAG 17-30, 2017 Tenn. AG LEXIS 29 (4/17/2017).

The definition of “agriculture” in T.C. A. §§ 1-3-105(a)(2)(A) and 43-1-113(b)(1) applies in determining the meaning of “agricultural” as used in T.C.A. § 5-1-118(b), T.C.A. § 5-1-122, and T.C.A. § 13-7-114. AG LEXIS 35 (7/26/2017).

1-3-106. Words of joint authority.

All words giving a joint authority to three (3) or more persons or officers, give such authority to a majority of such persons or officers, unless it is otherwise declared.

Code 1858, § 58; Shan., § 69; Code 1932, § 22; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 1-306.

Law Reviews.

An Examination of The Tennessee Law of Administrative Procedure (George Street Boone), 1 Vand. L. Rev. 339 (1947).

1-3-107. Use of numerals.

The Roman numerals and Arabic figures are to be taken as part of the English language, and are always sufficient to express dates and amounts, unless otherwise imperatively directed by law.

Code 1858, § 53; Shan., § 64a; Code 1932, § 17; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 1-307.

1-3-108. Code as continuation of existing law.

For the purposes of construction, the provisions of this code insofar as they are substantially the same as existing law relating to the same subject matter shall be construed as continuations of and substitutes for the previously existing law repealed by § 1-2-104. It is not the purpose of this code to change the effect of any such existing law.

T.C.A., § 1-308.

Compiler's Notes. This section first appeared in the code as enacted by chapter 6 of the Public Acts of 1955.

Textbooks. Pritchard on Wills and Administration of Estates (4th ed., Phillips and Robinson), § 151.

Tennessee Jurisprudence, 4 Tenn. Juris., Automobiles, § 26.

1-3-109. Section headings and histories.

Headings to sections in this code and the references at the end of such sections giving the source or history of the respective sections shall not be construed as part of the law.

T.C.A., § 1-309.

Compiler's Notes. This section first appeared in the code as enacted by Acts 1955, ch. 6.

Law Reviews.

Uncovering Legislative History Sources in Tennessee (Steven R. Thorpe), 31 No. 3 Tenn. B.J. 19 (1995).

1-3-110. Severability of code.

It is hereby declared that the sections, clauses, sentences and parts of the Tennessee Code are severable, are not matters of mutual essential inducement, and any of them shall be exscinded if the code would otherwise be unconstitutional or ineffective. If any one (1) or more sections, clauses, sentences or parts shall for any reason be questioned in any court, and shall be adjudged unconstitutional or invalid, such judgment shall not affect, impair or invalidate the remaining provisions thereof, but shall be confined in its operation to the specific provision or provisions so held unconstitutional or invalid, and the inapplicability or invalidity of any section, clause, sentence or part in any one (1) or more instances shall not be taken to affect or prejudice in any way its applicability or validity in any other instance.

C. Supp. 1950, § 27.3; modified; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 1-310.

Textbooks. Tennessee Criminal Practice and Procedure (Raybin), § 16.65.

Law Reviews.

Criminal Law in Tennessee in 1970 — A Critical Survey (Joseph G. Cook), 38 Tenn. L. Rev. 182 (1971).

1-3-111. Certified mail.

Certified mail may be used instead of registered mail whenever the law requires a notice to be given by registered mail.

Acts 1957, ch. 38, § 1; T.C.A., § 1-311.

1-3-112. “Legal blindness” and “total blindness” — Definition.

In all statutes, rules and regulations enacted and/or promulgated by the state, its departments, agencies and institutions, wherein the term “total blindness,” that is, unable to distinguish between light and dark, is used or referred to, hereinafter, the term “legal blindness” meaning a person having not more than 20/200 with correcting glasses but with a limitation in the field of vision such that the widest diameter of the visual field subtends an angle no greater than twenty degrees (20°) shall be used.

Such blindness shall be certified by a duly licensed ophthalmologist, and/or optometrist.

In statutes enacted and/or rules and regulations promulgated prior to and in effect on March 17, 1961, the use of the term “total blindness” shall be construed to mean “legal blindness.”

Acts 1961, ch. 278, § 1; T.C.A., § 1-312.

1-3-113. Eighteen-year-olds — Legal responsibility — Tobacco, smoking hemp, or vapor products and alcoholic beverage restrictions on persons under twenty-one (21) years of age.

Notwithstanding any laws to the contrary, any person who is eighteen (18) years of age or older shall have the same rights, duties, and responsibilities as a person who is twenty-one (21) years of age, except as provided in subsection (b) relative to the rights to purchase, possess, transport, and consume any tobacco, smoking hemp, or vapor products as those terms are defined in title 39 or alcoholic beverages, wine, or beer as those terms are defined in title 57.

Notwithstanding subsection (a), it is unlawful for any person under twenty-one (21) years of age to purchase, possess, transport or consume tobacco, smoking hemp, or vapor products, alcoholic beverages, wine, or beer, with the following exceptions:

Any person eighteen (18) years of age or older may transport, possess, sell, or dispense tobacco, smoking hemp, or vapor products, alcoholic beverages, wine, or beer in the course of such person's employment; and

The provisions of § 39-17-705(1) shall not be affected by any provision of subsection (b), it being the intent of the general assembly that such provisions remain lawful and in full force and effect. Any such priest or minister may utilize and administer alcohol or wine at a communion service, bat mitzvah, bar mitzvah, or other similar religious service or ceremony, in accordance with the practices of such denomination or sect.

Acts 1971, ch. 162, § 3; 1979, ch. 413, § 2; T.C.A., § 1-313; Acts 1984, ch. 1006, §§ 2, 9, 13-16; 1985, ch. 375, §§ 1-4; 1987, ch. 95, § 1; 1996, ch. 675, § 1; 2020, ch. 732, §§ 1, 2.

Amendments. The 2020 amendment inserted "any tobacco, smoking hemp, or vapor products as those terms are defined in title 39 or” in (a); and substituted "tobacco, smoking hemp, or vapor products, alcoholic beverages" for “alcoholic beverages” in (b) and (b)(1).

Effective Dates. Acts 2020, ch. 732, § 25. January 1, 2021.

Cross-References. Age of majority for alcoholic beverage and legal purposes, § 1-3-105.

Alcoholic beverage definitions, §§ 57-2-101, 57-3-101.

Juvenile alcohol abuse, title 68, ch. 24, part 4.

Lodging establishments, conduct of guests, title 68, ch. 14, part 6.

Minimum age for fire protection sprinkler system certification and licensing, § 62-32-107.

Removal of disability of minor veterans and spouses for receipt of benefits, § 58-3-103.

Sale of alcoholic beverages to minors, §§ 57-4-203, 57-5-301.

Support of child over 18 in high school, § 34-1-102.

Textbooks. Tennessee Criminal Practice and Procedure (Raybin), § 16.56.

Tennessee Jurisprudence, 18 Tenn. Juris., Limitations of Actions, §§ 3, 34; 18 Tenn. Juris., Minors, § 2; 20 Tenn. Juris., Parent and Child, § 18.

Law Reviews.

Criminal Law in Tennessee in 1971 — A Critical Survey (Joseph G. Cook), 39 Tenn. L. Rev. 247 (1972).

Attorney General Opinions. No driver's license suspension for underage consumers of alcohol, OAG 94-137 (11/21/94).

1-3-114. Eighteen-year-olds — Professional responsibility.

Notwithstanding any laws to the contrary, any person who is eighteen (18) years of age or older shall not be prohibited from entering into any profession or from performing any services on the basis of such person's minority.

Acts 1971, ch. 161, § 3; T.C.A., § 1-314.

Collateral References.

Statutory change of age of majority as affecting pre-existing status or rights. 75 A.L.R.3d 228.

Validity and construction of covenant restricting occupancy of premises to person over or under specified age. 68 A.L.R.3d 1239, 526 P.2d 747, 1974 Ariz. App. LEXIS 453.

1-3-115. Effect of law reducing age limit.

The provisions of chapter 612 of the Public Acts of 1972, reducing the age limitations from twenty-one (21) years of age to eighteen (18) years of age in §§ 23-1-102 [repealed], 23-1-107, 34-1-106 [repealed], 34-2-201 [repealed], 34-3-412 [repealed], 35-7-102 [repealed], 36-1-102, 36-1-105 and 57-4-203 and the definition of “minor” in § 1-3-105 shall not be considered as repealing or otherwise limiting the provisions of §§ 1-3-113 and 1-3-114.

Acts 1972, ch. 612, § 10; T.C.A., § 1-315.

Compiler's Notes. Section 23-1-102, referred to in this section, was repealed by Acts 1981, ch. 238, § 1.

Sections 34-1-106, 34-2-201 and 34-3-412 were repealed by Acts 1992, ch. 794, §§ 33 and 40, effective January 1, 1993. Acts 1992, ch. 794, § 7 enacted a new § 34-1-106; however, the section referred to above was repealed.

Former § 35-7-102, referred to in this section, was repealed by Acts 1992, ch. 664, § 2.

The age limitation of 18 years in § 57-4-203, referred to in this section, has subsequently been increased to 21 years.

Collateral References.

Burden of proof of defendant's age, in prosecution where attainment of particular age is statutory requisite of guilt. 49 A.L.R.3d 526.

Statutory change of age of majority as affecting pre-existing status or rights. 75 A.L.R.3d 228.

Validity and construction of covenant restricting occupancy of premises to person over or under specified age. 68 A.L.R.3d 1239, 526 P.2d 747, 1974 Ariz. App. LEXIS 453.

1-3-116. Population figures.

Except as provided in subsection (b), references in this code to the federal censuses of population or brackets based on such censuses shall be deemed references to or based on the population figures contained in Volume 13 of this code, or its replacement volume which are reproduced from publications of the United States bureau of the census as specified below, and shall not be affected by revisions, corrections, or alterations to such population figures by the United States bureau of the census subsequent to the publication of these publications:

Census of 1900 and Census of 1910: Bureau of the census. Thirteenth Census of the United States. Taken in the Year 1910. Volume 1. Population. General Report and Analysis, pp. 118, 119;

Census of 1920 and Census of 1930: Bureau of the census. Fifteenth Census of the United States: 1930. Volume 1. Population. Distribution of Inhabitants, pp. 1033, 1034;

Census of 1940 and Census of 1950: Bureau of the census. A Report of the Seventeenth Decennial Census of the United States. Census of Population: 1950. Volume 1. Number of Inhabitants, pp. 42-10, 42-11;

Census of 1960 and Census of 1970: U.S. bureau of the census. U.S. Census of Population: 1970. Number of Inhabitants. Final Report of PC(1)-A44 Tennessee, pp. 44-15, 44-16;

Census of 1980: U.S. Bureau of the Census. 1980 Census of Population and Housing: Tennessee, PHC80-V-44. April 1, 1980;

Census of 1990: U.S. Bureau of the Census. 1990 Census of Population: Tennessee, 1990 CP-1-44;

Census of 2000: U.S. Bureau of the Census. 2000 Census of Population and Housing: Tennessee, 2000 PHC-1-44; and

Census of 2010: U.S. Bureau of the Census. 2010 Census of Population and Housing: Tennessee, 2010 CPH-1-44.

Subsection (a) does not apply to the provisions of title 3, chapter 1, relative to legislative reapportionment; § 8-24-101, relative to the classification of counties for the purpose of determining the compensation of county officers and clerks of court; §§ 16-15-204 [repealed] and 16-15-5001, relative to the classification of counties for the purpose of determining the compensation of judges; to any provision of the code in which a population figure may be adjusted by a local or state conducted supplemental census; or to any instance where an intent contrary to this section is evidenced.

Acts 1985, ch. 134, § 2; 1989, ch. 107, § 1; 2018, ch. 581, §§ 1, 2.

Compiler's Notes. Former § 16-15-204, referred to in this section, was repealed in 1993.

Amendments. The 2018 amendment substituted “2000 PHC-1-44” for “2000 CPC-1-44” in (a)(7); and added (a)(8).

Effective Dates. Acts 2018, ch. 581, § 4. March 16, 2018.

1-3-117. Korean War.

All references in Tennessee Code Annotated to “Korean Conflict” are hereby amended to read “Korean War.”

All references to “Korean Conflict” included within the official publications, communications, memoranda, letters, public records, legal documents and all other official records of the State of Tennessee shall be deemed to read “Korean War” on April 13, 2000.

Acts 2000, ch. 656, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2000, ch. 656, § 2, directed the code commission to change all references from “Korean Conflict” to “Korean War” and to include all such changes in the 2000 supplements and replacement volumes for Tennessee Code Annotated. Section 3 of the act provided that all other departments and agencies shall implement the provisions of the act no later than January 1, 2001.

Cross-References. Special license plates for honorably discharged veterans, § 55-4-253.

1-3-118. Recognition of high school diplomas from church-related schools and home schools.

Notwithstanding any rule, regulation or other law to the contrary, a high school diploma awarded by a school as defined by § 49-50-801 or § 49-6-3050 in recognition of completion of secondary educational requirements shall be considered by all departments, agencies, commissions or other such entities of state and local government as having all the rights and privileges of a high school diploma awarded by a public school system.

This section shall not apply to state lottery proceeds as provided in title 49, chapter 4, part 9.

Acts 2009, ch. 329, § 1.

1-3-119. Express language required to create or confer a private right of action.

In order for legislation enacted by the general assembly to create or confer a private right of action, the legislation must contain express language creating or conferring the right.

In the absence of the express language required by subsection (a), no court of this state, licensing board or administrative agency shall construe or interpret a statute to impliedly create or confer a private right of action except as otherwise provided in this section.

Nothing in this section shall be construed in any way to impair the ability of a court to:

Recognize a private right of action that was recognized before July 1, 2012, by the courts of this state as arising under a statute, unless the statute is amended after July 1, 2012, to expressly bar the private right of action;

Create or confer a private right of action in the absence of a controlling statute on each cause of action contained in the complaint if such action is based on the common law;

Utilize the doctrine of negligence per se; or

Recognize a private right of action commenced by a state or local governmental entity to collect any fees owed for a governmental service or to recover such fees from a party that is obligated to bill and collect fees owed others for a governmental service.

Nothing in this section shall be construed in any way to impair the ability of a state or local regulatory or licensing agency to enforce rules pursuant to the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5, if such rules were duly enacted through the rulemaking authority granted to any such agency by statute.

Acts 2012, ch. 759, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2012, ch. 759, § 2 provided that the act, which enacted this section, shall apply to all actions that accrue on or after July 1, 2012.

1-3-120. Newspapers of general circulation that publish public notices required to post notice in its entirety on web site for same price.

Beginning April 1, 2014, in all cases where a public notice or legal notice is required to be published in a newspaper of general circulation, the newspaper shall for the same price post the complete notice:

On the newspaper's web site, where it shall be published contemporaneously with the notice's first print publication and will remain on the web site for at least as long as the notice appears in the newspaper; and

On a statewide web site established and maintained as a joint venture of the majority of Tennessee newspapers as a repository for such notices and will remain on the repository web site for at least as long as it appears in the newspaper. Any newspaper of general circulation that meets the criteria of this subsection (a) shall have access to the statewide web site at no charge.

Any such notice shall be published online in its entirety, including maps and other exhibits, and shall include the date on which it was first printed in the newspaper.

An error in a notice placed on the newspaper web site or statewide web site, or temporary web site outages or service interruptions prohibiting the posting or display of such notice shall be considered harmless error and proper legal notice requirements shall be considered met if the notice published in the newspaper is correct.

Each newspaper of general circulation publishing public notices shall include on its web site home page a link to its public notice section and shall include on its public notice home page a link to the statewide public notice web site.

Any notice published on a web site pursuant to subdivisions (a)(1) and (2) shall be accessible to the public at no charge.

Acts 2013, ch. 124, § 1.

1-3-121. Cause of action under chapter.

Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, a cause of action shall exist under this chapter for any affected person who seeks declaratory or injunctive relief in any action brought regarding the legality or constitutionality of a governmental action. A cause of action shall not exist under this chapter to seek damages.

Acts 2018, ch. 621, § 1.

Effective Dates. Acts 2018, ch. 621, § 2. April 2, 2018.

1-3-122. References to committees of general assembly that no longer exist.

References in this code to committees of the general assembly that no longer exist due to rule change of either the senate or house of representatives are deemed to be references to the committee that has jurisdiction of the subject matter pursuant to the rules of the appropriate chamber.

Acts 2019, ch. 345, § 2.

Effective Dates. Acts 2019, ch. 345, § 148. May 10, 2019.